Illinois, session 104th, SB1075.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Residential Mortgage License Act of 1987 is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 635/1-1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 2321-1)7    Sec. 1-1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Residential Mortgage License Act of 1987".9(Source: P.A. 85-735.)